Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-517 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For purposes of this section, “commercial harvesting
facility” means a privately or publicly owned premises managed or
engaged on a business basis for the harvesting or hunting of legally
acquired and privately owned cervidae, which may include white-
tailed deer, mule deer, and elk, cervidae hybrids, turkey, exotic
species, and exotic hybrid species, for barter, for the offer to
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1074 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

sell , or for the possession with intent to sell for profit or
monetary gain.
B. No person may propagate or hold in captivity any wildlife or
domesticated animals hunted for sport for a commercial harvesting
facility without having procured a commercial harvesting facility
license from the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and
Forestry. A commercial harvesting facility shall be issued a
commercial harvesting facility license upon completion of an
application and adherence to all applicable laws and rules governing
the harvesting of legally acquired cervidae, which may include
white-tailed deer, mule deer, and elk, cervidae hybrids, turkey,
exotic species, and exotic hybrid species harvested in a commercial
harvesting facility. Nothing in this section shall allow a person
to propagate or hold in captivity any wildlife belonging to the
state.
C. Before obtaining a commercial harvesting facility license or
renewal of a license, the applicant shall submit proof that any
additional wildlife or domesticated animals have been secured from a
source other than wild stock in this state.
D. The Secretary of Agriculture, State Veterinarian, or his or
her designees shall have the authority to inspect a commercial
harvesting facility and its operations at any time upon evidence of
probable cause that a violation of this section or of the Oklahoma

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1074 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Farm ed Cervidae Act has occurred. The Department shall be required
to provide notice of all other inspections as determined by rule.
E. The annual fee for a commercial harvesting facility license
shall be Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00).
F. All licenses issued pursuant to this section shall expire
August 31 of each year. After the effective date of this act,
facilities issued a big game license or a combination of big game
and upland game license pursuant to Section 4-106 of Title 29 of the
Oklahoma Statutes shall be required to obtain a commercial
harvesting facility license pursuant to this section.
G. The Department shall promulgate rules as necessary to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 29 O.S. 2021, Section 4-106, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4-106. A. No person may propagate or hold in captivity
any wildlife or domesticated animals hunted for sport for commercial
hunting area purposes without having procured a license from the
Director of the Department of Wildlife Conservation. Licenses shall
be classified as big game, upland game, or a combination of big game
and issued pursuant to this section shall be for commercial hunting
areas for upland game.
1. A big game license shall be required for legally acquired
exotic ungulates, domesticated animals so designated by the Oklahoma
Wildlife Conservation Commission, exotic swine, and legally acquired
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1074 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

whit etail and mule deer, turkey and other species of big game
lawfully taken under the provisions of subsection A of Section 5-411
and Section 5-401 of this title. Wildlife that has been crossbred
with exotic wildlife shall be considered native and not exotic
unless documentation shows otherwise.
2. An upland game license shall be required for legally
acquired captive-raised pheasants, all species of quail, Indian
chukars, water fowl waterfowl, and other similar or suitable
gallinaceous birds; and shall include turkey if no other big game
species are listed on the license/application.
B. Before obtaining a an upland game license or a renewal of a
license the applicant shall submit proof that such wildlife or
domesticated animals hunted for sport will be or have been secured
from a source other than the wild stock in this state. Any person
obtaining or renewing a an upland game license shall submit a true
and complete inventory of said the animals before a license shall be
approved. Each license shall specifically list the different
species and/or subspecies to be hunted on the listed hunting area or
premises.
C. Any game warden of the Oklahoma Department of Wildlife
Conservation shall have authority to inspect any and all records and
invoices pertaining to the commercial hunting operations of any
person licensed or requesting licensure pursuant to subsection B of
this section and additionally shall have the authority to inspect
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1074 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

any and all facilities, equipment and property connected to the
hunting operation of any person licensed or requesting licensure
pursuant to subsection B of this section.
D. 1. The annual fee for a commercial hunting area license for
upland game under this section shall be One Hundred Dollars
($100.00).
2. The annual fee for a commercial hunting area license for:
a. big game pursuant to this section shall be Two Hundred
Fifty Dollars ($250.00), or
b. a combination of big game and upland game pursuant to
this section shall be Three Hundred Fifty Dollars
($350.00).
E. All licenses An upland game license issued pursuant to this
section shall expire on June 30 of each year.
F. Exemptions from this license requirement shall be operators
of running pens used for the performance test or training of dogs.
Operators of such running pens may acquire coyotes from wild stock
without having to possess a fur dealer’s license for such purpose
and no license shall be required of those involved in performance
testing or training dogs in such running pens so long as no other
wildlife are taken or hunted in any manner.
G. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this
section shall be punished by a fine of not less than Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1074 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

($1, 500.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed
sixty (60) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
H. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this
section shall have the commercial hunting area upland game license
revoked. No new license shall be issued for a period of six (6)
months from and after the date on which the revocation order becomes
effective.
I. The Department is authorized to promulgate rules pertaining
to commercial hunting areas this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
February 24, 2025 - DO PASS









SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1074 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)